Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 2 Inspection Warrants

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding use of inspection warrants in enforcement of public health laws, §

37-1-70

et seq.

31-5-20.
“Inspection warrant” defined.

As used in this article, the term “inspection warrant” means a warrant authorizing a search or inspection of private property where such a search or inspection is one that is necessary for the enforcement of any of the provisions of laws authorizing licensure, inspection, or regulation by the Department of Public Health or a local agency thereof.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-301A, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 693, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1667, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-11/HB 214; Ga. L. 2015, p. 598, § 1-11/HB 72.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (2015).

31-5-21.
Persons who may obtain inspection warrants; authorization of searches and inspections of property.

The commissioner of public health or his or her delegate or the director of any county board of health, in addition to other procedures now or hereafter provided, may obtain an inspection warrant under the conditions specified in this chapter. Such warrant shall authorize the commissioner of public health or the director of any county board of health, or the agents of any, or the Department of Agriculture, as appropriate, to conduct a search or inspection of property, either with or without the consent of the person whose property is to be searched or inspected, if such search or inspection is one that is elsewhere authorized under the rules and regulations duly promulgated under this title or any provision of law which authorizes licensure, inspection, or regulation by the Department of Public Health or a local agency thereof.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-302A, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 693, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1667, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-12/HB 214; Ga. L. 2015, p. 598, § 1-12/HB 72.

Cross references.

Search warrants generally, §

17-5-20

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (2015).

31-5-22.
Issuance; grounds.

Inspection warrants shall be issued only by a judge of a court of record whose territorial jurisdiction encompasses the property to be inspected.

The issuing judge shall issue the warrant when he is satisfied that the following conditions are met:

The one seeking the warrant must establish under oath or affirmation that the property to be inspected is to be inspected as a part of a legally authorized program of inspection which includes that property or that there is probable cause for believing that there is a condition, object, activity, or circumstance which legally justifies such an inspection of that property; and

The issuing judge determines that the issuance of the warrant is authorized by this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 88-303A, 88-304A, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 693, § 1.

31-5-23.
Contents.

The inspection warrant shall be validly issued only if it meets the following requirements:

The warrant is attached to the affidavit required to be made in order to obtain the warrant;

The warrant describes, either directly or by reference to the affidavit, the property upon which the inspection is to occur and is sufficiently accurate that the executor of the warrant and the owner or possessor of the property can reasonably determine from it the property of which the warrant authorizes an inspection;

The warrant indicates the conditions, objects, activities, or circumstances which the inspection is intended to check or reveal; and

The warrant refers, in general terms, to the statutory or regulatory provisions sought to be enforced.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-305A, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 693, § 1.

31-5-24.
[Repealed] Exclusion of evidence obtained.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-306A, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 693, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 598, § 1-13/HB 72, effective July 1, 2015.